Utah, session 2026, HB174.
Section 1. Section 58-1-603.1 is amended to read:58-1-603.1. Hormonal transgender treatment prohibition for minors.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Cross-sex hormone treatment" means administering, prescribing, or supplying for effectuating or facilitating an individual's attempted sex change:(i)to an individual whose biological sex at birth is female, a dose of testosterone or other androgens at levels above those normally found in an individual whose biological sex at birth is female; or(ii)to an individual whose biological sex at birth is male, a dose of estrogen or a synthetic compound with estrogenic activity or effect at levels above those normally found in an individual whose biological sex at birth is male.(b)"Health care provider" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-1-603.(b)(c)"Hormonal transgender treatment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-1-603.(d)"Minor" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-1-603.(2)ASubject to Subsection (3), a health care provider may not provide a hormonal transgender treatment to a patient who:(a)is a minor as defined in Section 58-1-603; and(b)is not diagnosed with gender dysphoria before January 28, 2023.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection 58-1-603(3)(a), beginning on January 28, 2027, a health care provider may not provide a hormonal transgender treatment to a patient who is a minor if the patient:(a)would be younger than 16 years old as of the effective date of this bill; or(b)has not received cross-sex hormones as of the effective date of this bill.(4)A health care provider who provides hormonal transgender treatment to a minor for the purpose of discontinuing treatment before January 28, 2027, may provide the treatment without obtaining a transgender treatment certification described in Section 58-1-603.(3)(5)A violation of Subsection (2) or (3) is unprofessional conduct.

Section 2:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), May 6, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.

Section 3:
Section 4.  Revisor instructions.The Legislature intends that the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, in preparing the Utah Code database for publication, to revise Section 58-1-603.1 by replacing each instance of the phrase "the effective date of this bill" with the bill's actual effective date.